 

	First Public




















































Access Your Account


Open an Account


Careers


Contact Us









At First Public, we know Texas. From sprawling urban areas to remote rural communities, we offer investment and employee benefit services that fit the unique needs of school districts and local governments. 
 











	Member FINRA/SIPC

	Copyright © 2004-First Public, LLC. All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy

Terms & Conditions of Use

Feedback|Disclaimer|BCP Disclosure












 

	TASB Benefits Cooperative | First Public





















































Access Your Account


Open an Account


Careers


Contact Us














     
Since 2002, TASB has been associated with programs that provide school districts and their employees with employer-paid and employee-paid benefits.











Benefit Options


Governance


Getting Started




Home
&nbsp &gt &nbspTASB Benefits Cooperative

TASB Benefits Cooperative

Attracting and retaining good employees is an ongoing struggle for Texas school districts. In response, the Texas Association of School Boards (TASB) facilitated the formation of  the TASB Benefits Cooperative to offer valuable benefits that districts can utilize to help retain employees as well as attract new employees. These benefit programs are tailored to public school employees and provide valuable benefits to the employee and family members. In addition, the benefit programs are offered at special group rates, so employees and the district can save money.
Since 2002, TASB has been associated with programs that provide school districts and their employees with a variety of employer-paid and employee-paid benefits such as group life, group long-term disability, and Section 125 products and plan administration.
The Benefits Cooperative is administered by First Public, LLC, a wholly owned subsidiary of TASB, which offers you the added comfort of oversight from a trusted source. First Public is licensed with the Texas Department of Insurance.

403b and 457 TPA Request for Proposal





	Group Life and Group Long-term Disability

We help school districts provide their employees outstanding supplemental benefits at affordable rates.
Read more...



	Section 125 Administration

Our Section 125 Administration services and insurance options help you offer a breadth of choices to your employees.

Read more...










	Member FINRA/SIPC

	Copyright © 2004-First Public, LLC. All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy

Terms & Conditions of Use

Feedback|Disclaimer|BCP Disclosure














FIRST CLASS PUBLIC ADJUSTING, LLC Credit report, products, contacts













 Florida






Search









    FIRST CLASS PUBLIC ADJUSTING, LLC











Company number L17000152041
        

Status Active
        

FEI number


Company Type Florida Limited Liability
        

Home State FL
        

Last activity date not available
        

Date Of Incorporation 7/12/2017
        

Principal Address
            841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, 32712
            


Mailing Address 841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, FL, 32712
        
FIRST CLASS PUBLIC ADJUSTING, LLC Principals

Manager
                Werner Edward
                 


Address
                841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, FL, 32712
                 







Registered Agent

Agent Name WERNER              EDWARD (p)
        

Agent Address
                841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, FL, 32712
                

Description
FIRST CLASS PUBLIC ADJUSTING, LLC has been set up 7/12/2017 in state FL.  
The current status of the business is Active. The FIRST CLASS PUBLIC ADJUSTING, LLC principal adress is 841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, 32712. 
Meanwhile you can send your letters to 841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, FL, 32712. 
The company`s registered agent is WERNER              EDWARD 841 BROOKFIELD PL, APOPKA, FL, 32712.  
The company`s management are Manager - Werner Edward.






Comprehensive Report about this company
        





(view sample)








Similar Companies
FIRST CLASS PUBLICATIONS, CORP.
FIRST CLASS PUBLICATIONS, INC.
FIRST CLASS PUBLICATIONS OF FLORIDA, LLC
FIRST CLASS PUBLISHING, LLC
FIRST CLASS QUALITY HOMES, INC
FIRST CLASS QUALITY PAINTING, INC.













First Texas Products, LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 23, 2017 10:19 PM ET
Electronic Equipment, Instruments and Components

Company Overview of First Texas Products, LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
First Texas Products, LLC manufactures and sells metal detectors. Its metal detectors are used to find coins, rings, jewelry, and relics. The company sells its products through dealers or retailers in the United States, Canada, Europe, Latin America, Asia, the Middle East, Africa, Australia, and New Zealand. First Texas Products, LLC was founded in 1999 and is based in El Paso, Texas.


1465-H Henry BrennanEl Paso, TX 79936United StatesFounded in 1999



Phone: 915-633-8354

Fax: 915-633-8175

www.detecting.com







Key Executives for First Texas Products, LLC




Mr. Thomas Walsh


      	Founder, Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
      








 Daniel Duarte


      	Secretary
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 #1 Network, Inc. United States 10x Communications, Inc. United States 1450 Inc. United States 1st Choice Security Solutions, Inc. United States 20th Century Lites, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact First Texas Products, LLC, please visit www.detecting.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





























403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.







Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Limited liability company - Wikipedia






















 






Limited liability company

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"LLC" redirects here. For other uses, see LLC (disambiguation).
This article is about the United States-specific business entity form. For limited liability companies in the United Kingdom, see Limited company. For a general discussion of entities with limited liability, see Corporation.





This article includes a list of references, but its sources remain unclear because it has insufficient inline citations. Please help to improve this article by introducing more precise citations. (May 2009) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)




This article is part of a series on


Corporate law







By jurisdiction


Anguilla
Australia
BVI
Canada
Cayman Islands
India
South Africa
United States
Vietnam

European Union

France
Germany
United Kingdom










General corporate forms


Company
Conglomerate
Cooperative
Corporation
Holding company
Joint-stock
Partnership

General
Limited
Limited liability


Private limited
Sole proprietorship








Corporate forms
by jurisdiction



European Union




Societas (SE)
Societas cooperativa (SCE)
Societas privata (SPE)
Societas unius personae (SUP)
Economic interest grouping (EEIG)




UK / Ireland / Commonwealth




Charitable incorporated organisation (CIO)
Community interest company (CIC)
Industrial and provident society (IPS)

Limited company (Ltd.)

by guarantee
by shares
proprietary
public


Unlimited company




United States




Benefit corporation
C corporation
Limited liability company (LLC)

Low-profit LLC


Series LLC
Limited liability limited partnership (LLLP)
S corporation
Delaware corporation / statutory trust
Massachusetts business trust
Nevada corporation




Others




Aktiebolag (AB)
Aktiengesellschaft (AG)
Ansvarlig selskap (ANS)
Aktieselskab (A/S)
Aksjeselskap (AS)
Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH)
Kabushiki gaisha (K.K.)
Naamloze vennootschap (N.V.)
Osakeyhtiö (Oy)
S.A.
Société à responsabilité limitée (SARL)
more...











Doctrines


Business judgment rule
Corporate governance
De facto and estoppel corporations
Internal affairs doctrine
Limited liability
Piercing the corporate veil
Rochdale Principles
Ultra vires








Related areas


Civil procedure
Contract
Corporate registers








Company portal
Law portal







v
t
e





A limited liability company (LLC) is the United States-specific form of a private limited company. It is a business structure that combines the pass-through taxation of a partnership or sole proprietorship with the limited liability of a corporation.[1][2] An LLC is not a corporation; it is a legal form of a company that provides limited liability to its owners in many jurisdictions. LLCs do not need to be organized for profit.[3] In certain U.S. states (for example, Texas), businesses that provide professional services requiring a state professional license, such as legal or medical services, may not be allowed to form an LLC but may be required to form a similar entity called a professional limited liability company (PLLC).[4]



Contents


1 Overview
2 Flexibility and default rules
3 Income tax
4 Advantages
5 Disadvantages
6 Variations
7 International equivalents

7.1 Albania
7.2 Argentina
7.3 Bosnia and Herzegovina
7.4 Brazil
7.5 Bulgaria
7.6 Chile
7.7 Colombia
7.8 Croatia
7.9 Czech Republic
7.10 Denmark
7.11 Dominican Republic
7.12 Estonia
7.13 Finland
7.14 Germany
7.15 Greece
7.16 Hong Kong
7.17 Hungary
7.18 Iceland
7.19 India
7.20 Iran
7.21 Italy
7.22 Japan
7.23 Macedonia, Republic of
7.24 Mexico
7.25 Moldova
7.26 Norway
7.27 Pakistan
7.28 Peru
7.29 Poland
7.30 Portugal
7.31 Romania
7.32 Russia
7.33 Serbia
7.34 Slovakia
7.35 Slovenia
7.36 Spain
7.37 Sweden
7.38 Switzerland
7.39 Tajikistan
7.40 Turkey
7.41 Ukraine
7.42 United Arab Emirates
7.43 United Kingdom
7.44 United States


8 See also
9 References



Overview[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is a hybrid business entity having certain characteristics of both a corporation and a partnership or sole proprietorship (depending on how many owners there are). An LLC, although a business entity, is a type of unincorporated association and is not a corporation. The primary characteristic an LLC shares with a corporation is limited liability, and the primary characteristic it shares with a partnership is the availability of pass-through income taxation. It is often more flexible than a corporation, and it is well-suited for companies with a single owner.
In the absence of express statutory guidance, most American courts have held that LLC members are subject to the same common law alter ego piercing theories as corporate shareholders. However, it is more difficult to pierce the LLC veil because LLCs do not have many formalities to maintain. So long as the LLC and the members do not commingle funds, it would be difficult to pierce this veil.[5] Membership interests in LLCs and partnership interests are also afforded a significant level of protection through the charging order mechanism. The charging order limits the creditor of a debtor-partner or a debtor-member to the debtor's share of distributions, without conferring on the creditor any voting or management rights.[citation needed] Limited liability company members may, in certain circumstances, also incur a personal liability in cases where distributions to members render the LLC insolvent.[6]
Flexibility and default rules[edit]
The phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement" (or its equivalent) is found throughout all existing LLC statutes[citation needed] and is responsible for the flexibility the members of the LLC have in deciding how their LLC will be governed (provided it does not go outside legal bounds). State statutes typically provide automatic or "default" rules for how an LLC will be governed unless the operating agreement provides otherwise.
Similarly, the phrase "unless otherwise provided for in the by laws" is also found in all corporation law statutes[citation needed] but often refers only to a narrower range of matters.
The limited liability company ("LLC") has grown to become one of the most prevalent business forms in the United States. As the LLC's popularity has surged, unforeseen issues have emerged in these new statutes, particularly around single-member LLCs in Florida, New York, California, Colorado, and Georgia, where personal asset protection has been subverted.[7]
Effective August 1, 2013, the Delaware Limited Liability Company Act provides that the managers and controlling members of a limited liability company owe fiduciary duties of care and loyalty to the limited liability company and its members. Under the amendment (prompted by the Delaware Supreme Court's decision in Gatz Properties, LLC v. Auriga Capital Corp, November 2012), parties to an LLC remain free to expand, restrict, or eliminate fiduciary duties in their LLC agreements (subject to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing).[8]
Under 6 Del. C. Section 18-101(7), a Delaware LLC operating agreement can be written, oral or implied. It sets forth member capital contributions, ownership percentages, and management structure. Like a prenuptial agreement, an operating agreement can avoid future disputes between members by addressing buy-out rights, valuation formulas, and transfer restrictions. A written LLC operating agreement should be signed by all of its members.[9]
Income tax[edit]
For U.S. federal income tax purposes, an LLC is treated by default as a pass-through entity.[10] If there is only one member in the company, the LLC is treated as a “disregarded entity” for tax purposes, and an individual owner would report the LLC's income or loss on Schedule C of his or her individual tax return. Thus, income from the LLC is taxed at the individual tax rates. The default tax status for LLCs with multiple members is as a partnership, which is required to report income and loss on IRS Form 1065. Under partnership tax treatment, each member of the LLC, as is the case for all partners of a partnership, annually receives a Form K-1 reporting the member's distributive share of the LLC's income or loss that is then reported on the member's individual income tax return. On the other hand, income from corporations is taxed twice, once at the corporate entity level and again when distributed to shareholders, thus more tax savings often result if a business formed as an LLC rather than a corporation.[11]
An LLC with either single or multiple members may elect to be taxed as a corporation through the filing of IRS Form 8832.[12] After electing corporate tax status, an LLC may further elect to be treated as a regular C corporation (taxation of the entity's income prior to any dividends or distributions to the members and then taxation of the dividends or distributions once received as income by the members) or as an S corporation (entity level income and loss passes through to the members). Some commentators have recommended an LLC taxed as a S-corporation as the best possible small business structure. It combines the simplicity and flexibility of an LLC with the tax benefits of an S-corporation (self-employment tax savings).[13]
Advantages[edit]

Choice of tax regime. An LLC can elect to be taxed as a sole proprietor, partnership, S corporation or C corporation (as long as they would otherwise qualify for such tax treatment), providing for a great deal of flexibility.
A limited liability company with multiple members that elects to be taxed as partnership may specially allocate the members' distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit via the company operating agreement on a basis other than the ownership percentage of each member so long as the rules contained in Treasury Regulation (26 CFR) 1.704-1 are met. S corporations may not specially allocate profits, losses and other tax items under US tax law.
The owners of the LLC, called "members", are protected from some or all liability for acts and debts of the LLC, depending on state shield laws.
In the United States, an S corporation has a limited number of stockholders, and all of them must be U.S. citizens; an LLC may have an unlimited number of members, and there is no citizenship restriction.
Much less administrative paperwork and record-keeping than a corporation.
Pass-through taxation (i.e., no double taxation), unless the LLC elects to be taxed as a C corporation.
Using default tax classification, profits are taxed personally at the member level, not at the LLC level.
LLCs in most states are treated as entities separate from their members. However, in some jurisdictions such as Connecticut, case law has determined that owners were not required to plead facts sufficient to pierce the corporate veil and LLC members can be personally liable for operation of the LLC (see, for example, the case of Sturm v. Harb Development[14]).
LLCs in some states can be set up with just one natural person involved.
Less risk of being "stolen" by fire-sale acquisitions (more protection against "hungry" investors).
For real estate companies, each separate property can be owned by its own individual LLC, thereby shielding not only the owners but their other properties from cross-liability.

Disadvantages[edit]
Although there is no statutory requirement for an operating agreement in most jurisdictions, members of a multiple member LLC who operate without one may encounter problems. Unlike state laws regarding stock corporations, which are very well developed and provide for a variety of governance and protective provisions for the corporation and its shareholders, most states do not dictate detailed governance and protective provisions for the members of a limited liability company. Thus, in the absence of such statutory provisions, the members of an LLC must establish governance and protective provisions pursuant to an operating agreement or similar governing document.

It may be more difficult to raise financial capital for an LLC as investors may be more comfortable investing funds in the better-understood corporate form with a view toward an eventual IPO. One possible solution may be to form a new corporation and merge into it, dissolving the LLC and converting into a corporation.
Many jurisdictions—including Alabama, California, Kentucky, New York, Pennsylvania, Tennessee, and Texas—levy a franchise tax or capital values tax on LLCs. In essence, this franchise or business privilege tax is the fee the LLC pays the state for the benefit of limited liability. The franchise tax can be an amount based on revenue, an amount based on profits, or an amount based on the number of owners or the amount of capital employed in the state, or some combination of those factors, or simply a flat fee, as in Delaware.

Effective in Texas for 2007 the franchise tax is replaced with the Texas Business Margin Tax. This is paid as: tax payable = revenues minus some expenses with an apportionment factor. In most states, however, the fee is nominal and only a handful charge a tax comparable to the tax imposed on corporations.
In California, both foreign and domestic LLCs, corporations, and trusts, whether for-profit or non-profit—unless the entity is tax exempt—must at least pay a minimum income tax of $800 per year to the Franchise Tax Board; and no foreign LLC, corporation or trust may conduct business in California unless it is duly registered with the California Secretary of State.


The District of Columbia considers LLCs to be taxable entities, thus eliminating the benefit of pass-through taxes—subjecting members to double taxation.[15] Typically, LLCs will choose to be taxed as a partnership to avoid double taxation, which occurs in corporations. This allows companies to distribute their income among members who then report it on their personal tax returns.
Renewal fees may also be higher. Maryland, for example, charges a stock or nonstock corporation $120 for the initial charter, and $100 for an LLC. The fee for filing the annual report the following year is $300 for stock-corporations and LLCs. The fee is zero for non-stock corporations. In addition, certain states, such as New York, impose a publication requirement upon formation of the LLC which requires that the members of the LLC publish a notice in newspapers in the geographic region that the LLC will be located that it is being formed. For LLCs located in major metropolitan areas (e.g., New York City), the cost of publication can be significant.
The management structure of an LLC may not be clearly stated. Unlike corporations, they are not required to have a board of directors or officers. (This could also be seen as an advantage to some.)
Taxing jurisdictions outside the US are likely to treat a US LLC as a corporation, regardless of its treatment for US tax purposes—for example a US LLC doing business outside the US or as a resident of a foreign jurisdiction.[16] This is very likely where the country (such as Canada) does not recognize LLCs as an authorized form of business entity in that country.
The principals of LLCs use many different titles—e.g., member, manager, managing member, managing director, chief executive officer, president, and partner. As such, it can be difficult to determine who actually has the authority to enter into a contract on the LLC's behalf.

Variations[edit]

A Professional Limited Liability Company (PLLC, P.L.L.C., or P.L.) is a limited liability company organized for the purpose of providing professional services. Usually, professions where the state requires a license to provide services, such as a doctor, chiropractor, lawyer, accountant, architect, landscape architect, or engineer, require the formation of a PLLC.[17] However, some states, such as California, do not permit LLCs to engage in the practice of a licensed profession. Exact requirements of PLLCs vary from state to state. Typically, a PLLC's members must all be professionals practicing the same profession. In addition, the limitation of personal liability of members does not extend to professional malpractice claims.
A Series LLC is a special form of a Limited liability company that allows a single LLC to segregate its assets into separate series. For example, a series LLC that purchases separate pieces of real estate may put each in a separate series so if the lender forecloses on one piece of property, the others are not affected.
An L3C is a for-profit, social enterprise venture that has a stated goal of performing a socially beneficial purpose, not maximizing income. It is a hybrid structure that combines the legal and tax flexibility of a traditional LLC, the social benefits of a nonprofit organization, and the branding and market positioning advantages of a social enterprise.
An Anonymous Limited Liability Company is a LLC where ownership information is not made publicly available by the state where the LLC is registered. This is done by using a third-party to act as the organizer and registered agent of the LLC. Level of anonymity varies with different states.[18]

International equivalents[edit]





It has been suggested that this section be merged into Private limited company. (Discuss) Proposed since December 2014.


Companies with limited liability exist in business law worldwide. However, the limited liability company is a specific legal structure defined by the laws of U.S. states, with quite distinct characteristics. Many other countries have similar structures.
Albania[edit]
In Albania a limited liability company (Albanian: Shoqëri me përgjegjësi të kufizuar Sh.p.k) is a commercial company founded by persons of physical or judicial status, who are not liable for the company and personally bear losses only up to the outstanding contribution agreements. Partners' contributions constitute the registered capital of a limited liability company. Each partner has his quota in the company in proportion to the contribution of the capital so the registered capital of the company is divided between the partners based on the proportional ratio of their contribution. In Albania a limited liability company may not have a capital of less than 100 lek.[19]
Argentina[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Argentine variant of the LLC is called Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada (S.R.L.) and it limits the liability of its members up to their capital contribution in the company. The equity is divided into equal stakes (can not be called "shares"), each one of which represents a percentage of the company and that can not be traded on the stock exchange. Their by-laws are regulated by law N° 19550[20] and the commercial partnership is limited to a maximum of 50 partners.
Bosnia and Herzegovina[edit]
Bosnian and Herzegovinian legislation, similarly to that in Serbia, Montenegro, Macedonia contemplates LLCs as društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (d.o.o.). Companies using this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. to their company name. A shareholder or member in a d.o.o. is only personally liable up to the value of the member’s investment in the company.[21]
Brazil[edit]
The corporate structure in Brazilian law most similar to the American LLC is the Sociedade Limitada (“Ltda.”), under the new Brazilian Civil Code of 2002. The sociedade limitada is the new name of the sociedade por quotas de responsabilidade limitada, and it can be organized as empresária or simples, under this new code, roughly corresponding to the form types of comercial (“commercial”) and civil (“non commercial”) of the Commercial Code. A new law in Brazil has made it legal to obtain an LLC by a sole-proprietor called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidade Limitada (Eireli for short). The main requirement is a capital of 100 times the current minimum wage,[22] R$ 78.800,00 [23](US$26.267.00) as of 2015.
Bulgaria[edit]
Bulgarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Дружество с ограничена отговорност (Druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; Limited liability company). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation ООД (OOD) to their name. In case of an LLC with individual owner it is contemplated as Еднолично дружество с ограничена отговорност (Ednolichno druzhestvo s ogranichena otgovornost; One-man/ Single-member limited liability company) and abbreviated as ЕООД (EOOD).[24]
Chile[edit]
Chilean law contemplates a certain form of LLC known as "Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada" (Limited Liability Association). Also (LLC) These companies are regulated by law N° 3.918. Among their most important characteristics we can say that:

They can pursue a commercial or non-commercial purpose (Sociedad Comercial de Responsabilidad Limitada / Sociedad Civil de Responsabilidad Limitada).
They must be formed by two or more partners and can hold up to a maximum of fifty.
Their equity is divided into "cuotas" (not shares) each one of which represents a percentage of the company.
They can be managed by one or more managers (external if need be), or by a board of directors.
Their by-laws can't be modified, nor their partners be changed, without the consent of all the other partners.
In tax considerations, they differ from the LLC's because they pay a corporate tax for their income, amount that can be deducted by their owners as a credit against the taxes they pay.

Chilean law also contemplates a very special kind of individual owner LLC called Empresa Individual de Responsabilidad Limitada (Limited Liability Individual Company), which uses the E.I.R.L. abbreviation.
Colombia[edit]
Colombian legislation contemplates a very similar structure as mentioned above in the Chilean case. The Ltda. abbreviation is also used in Colombia.[25]
Croatia[edit]
In Croatia, a private limited liability company is termed društvo s ograničenom odgovornošću (literal: limited liability company), abbreviated d.o.o.. A public limited liability company is termed a dioničko društvo (literal: joint stock company) abbreviated d.d..[26]
Czech Republic[edit]
Czech legislation contemplates LLCs as společnost s ručením omezeným (s.r.o. or spol. s r.o.). An s.r.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation. Czech law does not offer a possibility to start up a limited company without the possibility of avoiding double taxation. As of 2014 the liability is not limited in Czech, since managing director (jednatel, mandatory board member in Czech LLCs) bears full liability that extends to all of his/her property, including private one.
Denmark[edit]
The Danish form of the LLC is the kommanditselskab (K/S). There is no minimum capital requirements. In a K/S there are two types of shareholders, the komplementar which is fully liable, and the kommanditist which liability is limited. The K/S is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Dominican Republic[edit]
Dominican Republic legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedad de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known by their abbreviation S.R.L.;; S.R.L.s award limited liability to their members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital). This type of company began after the law number 479 of the year 2008.
Estonia[edit]
In Estonia, a limited liability company is referred to as osaühing (OÜ). The type of entity is also required to be identified in the name. An OÜ is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.
Finland[edit]
Although not an exact equivalent, the Finnish version of the LLC is the Oy (osakeyhtiö) or in Swedish Ab (aktiebolag). An Oy is taxed as a corporation. The minimum capital required by law is €2,500.[27]
Germany[edit]
Because of its hybrid characteristics it is very difficult to determine the German equivalent. On one hand it is possible to consider it as a kind of Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) because it has aspects of a corporation; on the other hand it could be considered to be a kind of Kommanditgesellschaft (KG), which is the German equivalent of a limited partnership. Based on the literal translation of the word "company", an LLC should be considered to be a kind of KG without any liable partner. The German equivalent that comes closest to LLC, is GmbH & Co KG, a nested Kommanditgesellschaft (KG) where a Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (GmbH) takes the role of the fully liable partner. For the purpose of taxation, the Bundesfinanzministerium (German Federal Ministry of Finance) gives detailed guidelines of the circumstances under which an LLC is to be considered to be a "corporation" or as a "limited partnership".[28] It is useful to note, however, that the original LLC statutes of Wyoming and other US states were more or less explicitly modeled after the GmbH.[29]
Greece[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) in Greece is synonymous to an EPE (ΕΠΕ - Εταιρεία Περιορισμένης Ευθύνης).[30]
Hong Kong[edit]
In Hong Kong, the Limited Company is the most commonly incorporated type of company[31] and bears the characteristics of a Limited Liability Company. The core characteristics of a Hong Kong Limited Company include: i) it requires a minimum of one shareholder and one director (can be the same person), ii) a Hong Kong company requires a company secretary resident in HK, iii) foreign ownership is allowed, iv) company shareholders have limited liability and v) the company must have registered HK address.
Entrepreneurs who register a company in Hong Kong can choose a Hong Kong offshore company. This company structure is basically a HK Limited Company but all business is conducted outside of Hong Kong. The advantage of this structure is that all business income that is sourced outside of Hong Kong is tax exempt.
Hungary[edit]
Hungarian legislation contemplates LLCs as Korlátolt felelősségű társaság. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation Kft. to their name.[32] Hungarian LLCs are required to have a 3 million HUF (Hungarian Forint) (approx. 11,000 USD) starting capital. The time of formation by the new electronic formation option has been reduced from 2 weeks to 2 hours, additional cost of formation is around 100,000 HUF (approx. 540 USD). Kft.s can be formed by the cooperation of lawyers.
The Hungarian Kft. is the most common form of doing business in Hungary. As being part of the European Union (EU), Hungarian Kft.s can now obtain an EU VAT registration number for doing business across the EU. The Hungarian EU-VAT reg. number starts with "HU". This way the existence of the subject company, VAT issues and the cross-check is available on the common EU website for companies.[citation needed]
Iceland[edit]
According to Icelandic legislation, there are two types of LLC forms, private and public held limited liability forms. Private LLC is abbreviated "Ehf." The minimum capital of 500,000 Icelandic krónas (kr.). Public LLC is abbreviated "Hf." with minimum capital of 4,000,000 kr and goes to LLC.
India[edit]
Commonly used business forms in India are:
(a) Public and Private Limited Companies - Incorporated entities with limited liabilities. These are very similar to "Corporations" under U.S law.
(b) Limited Liability Partnerships (LLPs) - Incorporated entities with limited liability. The LLPs are organized as partnerships - they do not have a Board of Directors as such. LLP has lesser compliance requirements compared to Private limited companies. There is no maximum limit for the no. of partners in LLP. In the private limited company shareholders are limited to the extent of 200 shareholders.[33]
The above entities are treated as taxable entities ("persons"), and as such are liable to tax on their incomes. These entities do not offer "pass-through" taxation benefits, unlike LLCs in the USA.
India vide Limited Liability Partnership Act, 2008 introduced concept of LLP and it got implemented in 2009. 2 persons are required to Incorporate LLP in India and they are called designated partners. This form is very organised in India and controlled under Ministry of Corporate Affairs. There is no specific minimum capital requirement. Foreign Direct Investment too allowed in LLP. Essential part is one of the 2 promoters must be Indian Resident.
Iran[edit]
As of 2015, there are seven types of companies which can be registered under Iran's company registration law. One of these seven types of companies and partnerships refers to LLPs. Like many other countries, two persons are required to form an LLP in Iran. Each person has his/her own shares and is responsible for business liability equivalent to his/her share percentage. LLPs in Iran are named according to the format illustrated by the following example: "Sherkat Ba Masooliyate Mahdood" translates as "Sherkat شرکت Company" + "Mahdood محدود Limited" + "Masooliyat مسئولیت Liability".
Italy[edit]
The Italian Civil Code, approved in 1942 and as amended by the Government Act 6/2003 and furthers modifications, mainly provides three forms of limited liability company:

Società per azioni (S.p.A.): the minimum required starting capital for an SpA is €50,000.[34] The capital is divided into shares (azioni) that can be transferred by endorsement or bought and sold on stock exchange. Only SpAs can be quoted in stock exchange market, issue corporate bonds, and other financial instruments. SpA form and a higher capital are required by law to operate in protected businesses (i.e. banks, leasing companies, etc.).
Società a responsabilità limitata (Srl): the minimum required starting capital for an Srl is €10,000. Its capital is divided into stakes (quote) which can be bought or sold just by notarial act. Srls can issue corporate bonds but are subject to many limitations. Similar to the Srl is the Società Cooperativa a Responsabilità Limitata (Scarl) whose scope is not making profit but give benefits to stakes' holders.
Società in accomandita per azioni (Sapa): the minimum required starting capital for a Sapa is €120,000 divided into shares. Sapas have a mixed liability scheme, where standard shareholders have limited liability while managing shareholders have full liability. Except this, SAPAs are exactly like SPAs even if uncommon.

Companies append the corresponding abbreviation to their company names.
Japan[edit]
Japan passed legislation in 1996 creating a new type of business organization, godo kaisha (J-LLC), a close variant of the American LLC.[citation needed] Japanese Tax authority does not consider J-LLC (Godo-Kaisha) a pass-through entity, but as a taxable entity.
Macedonia, Republic of[edit]
Macedonian legislation contemplates LLCs as Друштво со ограничена одговорност (Drushtvo so ogranichena odgovornost). Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation д.о.о. (d.o.o.) to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d.o.o. is €5,000.
Mexico[edit]
Mexican legislation contemplates LLCs as Sociedades de Responsabilidad Limitada, also known for their abbreviation "S. de R.L.". S. de R.L.'s award limited liability to its members up to their contribution in the company (i.e., contribution of capital) and also act as pass-through or flow-through entities whereby profits are "passed-through" to its members, avoiding double taxation. This type of company is widely used by foreign investors in Mexico because of its "pass-through" modality and its "check the box" capability under the IRC (Internal Revenue Code of the U.S.).[citation needed]
Moldova[edit]
Moldovan legislation contemplates LLCs as Societate cu Răspundere Limitată, abbreviated "S.R.L.", and are regulated member(s)-founder(s), and other non-founder members, minimum one member-founder and maximum total of 50 members, at least one of them must be the founder of the company, but all of the 50 could be also founders.[citation needed]
Norway[edit]
In Norway, the closest to an LLC is probably the kommandittselskap (KS). In a K/S there are two types of participants, one komplementar which is fully liable, and one or more kommandittist, with limited liability. There are minimum capital requirements. The KS is a tax-transparent company, which means the income "passes through" the company directly to the shareholders.
Pakistan[edit]
In Pakistan, LLCs are known as private companies that end (Local Liability Company) with Pvt. Ltd. They should have at least Rs. 100,000 as their minimum paid up capital.
The Securities and Exchange Commission of Pakistan (SECP) has made it mandatory for all listed companies to file their documents, returns, accounts and applications through the commission's eServices online filing facility, earlier, this requirement was only applicable to the companies, which had been incorporated through eServices online filing facility.[35]
Peru[edit]
There is no direct equivalent of an LLC in Peru, but some similar corporate forms include:

Sociedad anónima cerrada (SAC), a corporation which must have at least two and not more than twenty shareholders; its shares may not be offered to the public and cannot be traded on the stock exchange.
Sociedad comercial de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), a commercial partnership divided in equal participations which may not be called "shares". It must have at least two and not more than twenty partners.
Sociedad civil de responsabilidad limitada (S civil de RL), a professional partnership of at least two and not more than thirty individuals, with co-owner participation in the form of capital, of professional contribution, or of any combination of both.
Empresa individual de responsabilidad limitada (EIRL), a legal entity with one single owner.

The capital for any of the above entities is freely determined by its statutes. There is no minimum requirement except for entities with certain types of activities, mainly in the financial markets, and then irrespective of their type.[36]
Poland[edit]
In Poland, a limited liability company is referred to literally as “company with limited liability” (spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością, legally abbreviated as sp. z o.o. (or sometimes Sp. z o.o. in particular names). Informally, in the Polish speaking slang, it is abbreviated as spółka zoo (pronounced with a long "o", as in "tow."). However, sp. z o.o. has a (separate from its owners) legal personality, which gives it the ability to do certain actions under law, and it is considered a "corporation".
The minimum start capital is 5,000 PLN (since 2009; until then, 50,000 PLN).
Portugal[edit]
In Portugal, LLCs are called "Sociedades de Responsabilidade Limitada", that is, "company of limited responsibility", usually abbreviated Lda.. They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, since 2006 the transference of them is not required to be done in the presence of a civil law notary, except if the company owns buildings, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a Lda. of €5000. (In 2006 the PS Government, led by José Socrates, did reduce the minimum capital to €1, but in 2011 the new PSD Government, led by Pedro Passos Coelho, reinstated the €5000 minimum capital.) The capital is not required to be deposited at the time of the registration of the company, instead the share holders have until 31 December of the year the registry was made.[citation needed]
Romania[edit]
Romania recognizes the limited liability company since 1990 under the name of societate cu răspundere limitată (S.R.L.), in which the owners are personally liable for the company obligations within the limit of their contribution to social capital. The minimum start capital is 200 RON which currently amounts to less than €50.[37]
Russia[edit]
In Russia and certain other former Soviet countries, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as Общество с ограниченной ответственностью (Obshchestvo s ogranichennoy otvetstvennost'yu) (lit., "company with limited liability"), usually abbreviated OOO, or in some CIS countries as OсOO.[citation needed]
Although a Russian limited liability company shares the same name with an American LLC, it is different in many ways. Most importantly, a Russian LLC is not tax transparent: the company is taxed at the corporate level, and then, upon distribution of dividends, shareholders pay income tax (personal or corporate).[citation needed]
A limited liability company is the most popular form of legal undertaking in Russia for simple shareholding structures.[38]
The minimum capital required is 10,000 Russian rubles.
Serbia[edit]
Serbian legislation contemplates LLCs as društvo sa ograničenom odgovornošću. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d.o.o. or DOO to their name same as in Croatia. As in the Czech Republic, a d.o.o. is not technically comparable to an LLC because the profits are still subject to double taxation.[citation needed] In Kosovo a company does not need to provide proof for payment of capital.[39]
Slovakia[edit]
In Slovakia, the law contemplates spoločnosť s ručením obmedzeným (abbreviation spol. s r. o. or s. r. o.) or as the rough equivalent of a limited liability company. It is very popular form of business organization due to ensurance of limited liability in exchange for a relatively small investment into the registered capital. From one to 50 associates can found it through a founding agreement with minimum registered capital of €5000, minimum €750 per person, in money or other property. (§ 105–153 of Act. No 513/1991 Coll. – Commercial Code as amended.)[40][41]
Slovenia[edit]
Slovenian legislation contemplates LLCs as družba z omejeno odgovornostjo. Companies working under this structure append the abbreviation d. o. o. to their name. The minimum required starting capital for a d. o. o. is €7,500. Due to the high cost and complicated bookkeeping of a real corporation, this is a more widespread form.[citation needed]
Spain[edit]
In Spain, LLCs are called Sociedad de responsabilidad limitada (SRL), "company of limited responsibility", or sociedad limitada (SL), or "limited partnership". They are tax subject, and company shares cannot be sold in a public market, the transference of them having to be done compulsorily in the presence of a civil law notary, in the same way other major properties have to be sold. Nonetheless, the responsibility of the partners is limited to the capital share they hold, and the minimum capital required by law for a S.L. is at least €3,000.
Sweden[edit]
Sweden has no equivalent of an LLC. The closest company form is the handelsbolag (lit.: "trade company"). The Swedish AB (aktiebolag; lit.: "share company"), like the handelsbolag, is a tax subject and is more similar to a US C Corporation than an LLC. The minimum capital required by law in a private company, privat aktiebolag, is SEK 50,000, although this may be in the form of assets as well as capital. It should be noted that the AB structure requires shareholders, a Board of Directors, and regular meetings of both, together with complete accounts once per year. Depending on the size of the AB, the accounts may have to be audited. Creation or purchase "off-the-shelf" of an AB is relatively cheap and tax effective, but liquidation of a created aktiebolag can be an expensive and time-consuming operation.[42] Creation of public limited liability companies, or publikt aktiebolag, which can raise capital from the public, requires a minimum capitalization of SEK 500,000, however the overall regulation of public companies in Sweden, especially regarding accounting methods and taxes, is thorough and detailed.[43]
Switzerland[edit]
The Swiss Code of Obligations[44] provides for different kinds of companies with limited liability, the two most commonly used are:
Swiss Limited Liability Company:[45][46] The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Gesellschaft mit beschränkter Haftung (abbreviation: GmbH), in French Société à responsabilité limitée (abbreviation: S.à r.l. or SARL) and in Italian Società a Garanzia Limitata (abbreviation: SaGL). A Swiss LLC is similar to an LLC with respect to various matters, including the following: Members may also be natural persons, corporations, partnerships or other LLCs,[47] the liability of a member of a Swiss LLC to pay for the LLC's obligations is limited to its capital contribution,[48] a Swiss LLC may be either member-managed or manager-managed,[49] and, unless otherwise provided for in the operating agreement, the members’ right to control or manage a Swiss LLC is proportionate to their individual membership interest.[50] The membership interests in a Swiss LLC have to be registered[51] and, thus, they may only be issued in the name of a member but not to the bearer.
Swiss Corporation[46][52] (in English common law context usually translated as company limited by shares): The terms for this kind of company used in the three official languages of the Swiss Confederation are as follows: In German Aktiengesellschaft (abbreviation: AG), in French Société Anonyme (abbreviation: SA) and in Italian Società Anonima (abbreviation: SA). A Swiss corporation is with respect to various matters different from an LLC (including a Swiss LLC): Most important is that a Swiss corporation may, neither by default nor by exercising any respective option provided by the Swiss law, be member-managed like an LLC, as the respective mandatory provisions of Swiss law provide that the board of directors has certain non-transferable duties.[53] Furthermore, the shares of a Swiss corporation may also be issued to the bearer (bearer shares)[54] and, thus, not only in the name of a holder (registered shares), which, however, applies to the membership interests in a Swiss LLC, which may only be registered.
Tajikistan[edit]
In Tajikistan, the same as in Russia, an entity with a somewhat similar structure is known as "Ҷамъияти дорои масъулияти маҳдуд", Chamiyti Doroi Masuliyti Machdud, abbreviated as "ҶДММ".
Turkey[edit]
Minimum capital should be 10,000 TL. That capital could be the minimum total capital of company. Number of founding shareholders (real persons or legal entities) could be minimum 1 and maximum 50. All or some of the shareholders could be foreign nationals. There is no issued stock certificates and all shareholders liability is limited to their registered capital amount. 1/4 of capital should be blocked in a Bank until procedure of registration ends. The equivalent of LLC for Turkish is Ltd. Şti. (Which means Limited Şirketi.)
Ukraine[edit]
This type of entity has existed in Ukraine since the 1990s. LLC is the most common type of business entity in Ukraine.[55] In Ukrainian, it is spelled "Товариство з обмеженою відповідальністю" (abbreviated – TОВ, TзОВ), in transliteration "Tovarystvo z Obmezhenoyu Vidpovidalnistyu," that is, "company with limited liability".
By Ukrainian law LLC is a legal person. Authorized capital of LLC is divided into shares (or stakes), the amount of which is determined by the charter. LLC is responsible to the creditors only with its assets. Legal entities (foreign or Ukrainian companies) individuals, regardless of their country of citizenship or residency can be the founders (participants) of LLC. Limited liability company can be formed either by one person or by several individuals or legal entities (corporations). Maximum number of participants (founders) of LLC in Ukraine is 100. Since 2014 registration procedure has been significantly simplified in Ukraine. Minimum amount of authorised capital is 1 (one) hryvnia (less than 0,04 US cents). There is no state fee for LLC formation.
By Ukrainian Law LLC dividend payment is possible after the declaration of company’s income or profit to the fiscal/tax authorities and the approval of the income statement.[56] Thus, regardless of the tax system, LLC can make dividend payments up to 4 times a year, or one time a quarter.
Taxation. LLC can be registered:
— as corporate/profit tax (18% rate) with or without VAT (up to 20% rate, depends on product or service) tax payer;
— fixed tax rate (in transliteration "yediniy podatok" or "sproschena sistema opodatkuvannia") is a 5% rate from revenue, with or without (on request) VAT registration.
United Arab Emirates[edit]
A Limited Liability Company (LLC) is the most common type of registration in the UAE and is recommended where the purpose of the entity is to make sales within the region. However, it should be noted that 100% foreign ownership of such an entity is not permitted. Under the UAE Commercial Companies Law (CCL), foreign investors are permitted to hold up to 49 per cent equity ownership in UAE companies and 51 per cent of the equity must be held at all times by one or more UAE nationals. In accordance with Article (218) of the CCL a Limited Liability Company can be formed by a minimum of 2 and a maximum of 50 shareholders whose liability is limited to their shares in the capital of the company. Recent amendments to Article (217) of the CCL that came into force in June 2009 removed the requirement for minimum share capital (previously AED 300,000 in Dubai and AED 150,000 in other Emirates) allowing founders of a limited liability company the freedom to determine the company’s share capital which could be less than the earlier prescribed bottom line. Shares of an LLC are not open for subscription by the public.[57] Despite the split in shareholdings, profits may be divided in other ratios agreed upon, taking into consideration efforts of foreign partners in management, provision of technology or expertise. Responsibility for the management of a LLC can be vested in the foreign partner or UAE national partners or a third party. A LLC must appoint a minimum of one manager and up to a maximum of five managers for the business. Managers must be appointed by a Memorandum of Association or by a management contract, for a fixed term or an unlimited term. Unless the Memorandum of Association states otherwise, the manager has full powers of administration and management of the LLC. LLC is not allowed to practice its activities in the UAE without a Trade License and Commercial Registration Certificate.
[58]
United Kingdom[edit]
The new form of limited liability partnership (LLP), created in 2000, is similar to a US LLC in being tax neutral: member partners are taxed at the partner level, but the LLP itself pays no tax. It is treated as a body corporate for all other purposes including VAT. Otherwise, all companies, including limited companies and US LLCs, are treated as bodies corporate subject to United Kingdom corporation tax if the profits of the entity belong to the entity and not to its members.
United States[edit]
A limited liability company (LLC) is a relatively new business structure authorized by state statutes.[59] The LLC is chiefly inspired by the GmbH ("Company with limited liability"), a type of business organization in Germany, and by the limitada, a type of business organization available in many Latin American countries.[29]
In the United States, the first limited liability company act appeared in Wyoming in 1977 as special interest[60] legislation for an oil company.[61] In 1980, the Internal Revenue Service issued a private letter ruling to an LLC formed under the Wyoming LLC Act, indicating that the IRS would treat the LLC as a partnership for federal tax purposes.[62] However, later that year, the IRS proposed regulations that would deny partnership classification to any business entity in which no member bore personal responsibility for the entity's liabilities.[63] In 1982, Florida adopted an LLC act modeled on Wyoming's LLC Act.[64] Due to uncertainty over the tax treatment of LLCs, no other states introduced LLC legislation until after 1988.[65] In 1988, the IRS issued a revenue ruling stating that it would treat a Wyoming-style LLC as a partnership for tax purposes.[66] By 1996, nearly every state had enacted an LLC statute.[67] The National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws adopted the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act in 1996 and revised it in 2006.[68]
A potential disadvantage specific to the United States is that LLCs are not considered to be corporations for the purposes of federal civil procedure; they are instead treated as partnerships. This affects the applicability of diversity jurisdiction in cases involving LLCs, barring application of diversity jurisdiction when even one member of the LLC is a citizen of the same state as one of the opposing parties. Should one member of an LLC be a citizen of a state of which one of the opposing parties is a citizen, any case between the LLC and those parties must be heard in that state's courts; corporations enjoy a more complete legal personhood that only denies diversity jurisdiction when the opposing party is a citizen of the state in which the corporation is incorporated (most commonly Delaware for large corporations, which has a small population) or has its principal place of business.
AOL was set up as an LLC during its ownership by Time Warner from 2001 to 2008. There is a similar setup for BMW's American subsidiary, BMW of North America, LLC. Chrysler has been an LLC since restructuring during the auto industry bailout of 2009, owned by Fiat Chrysler Automobiles N.V..
See also[edit]

Besloten vennootschap met beperkte aansprakelijkheid, a Belgian (bvba) and Dutch (bv) private limited company
Société à responsabilité limitée, LLCs in French speaking countries
Incorporation (business)
Limited Liability Partnership (LLP)
List of company registers
Types of business entity
Wholly Foreign-Owned Enterprise

References[edit]


^ "What is a Limited Liability Company?". Nolo.com. Nolo. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "What is an LLC?". limitedliabilitycompanycenter.com. LLC Center Publications LLC. Retrieved 19 December 2016. 
^ McCray, Richard A.; Thomas, Ward L. "Limited Liability Companies as Exempt Organizations" (PDF). IRS. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ Murray, Jean. "PLLC--Professional Limited Liability Company". About.com. Retrieved 22 April 2014. 
^ "What is "Piercing the Corporate Veil"". Law 4 Small Business. 21 May 2015. Retrieved 3 September 2016. 
^ See Del. Limited Liability Company Act § 18-607(b)
^ PLLC, Zamzow. "Zamzow PLLC Law Firm • Attorneys - Grand Rapids, MI - Legal Service". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "DLA Piper Global Law Firm". 
^ "Delaware LLC Agreement Pre-Flight Checklist - IncNow". 25 June 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "Instruction SS-4 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Presti and Naegele FAQ: What are the pros and cons of limited liability companies (LLCs)?
^ "Form 8832 (Rev. January 2011)" (PDF). Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Tax Advantages of Corporations - Updated for Tax Year 2015". TurboTax. Retrieved 2016-08-29. 
^ Sturm v. Harb Development, 298 Conn. 124, 2 A.3d 859 (2010), http://www.constructionrisk.com/2011/06/principal-of-limited-liability-can-be-sued-without-need-to-pierce-corporate-veil/
^ "District of Columbia LLC | DC LLC, District of Columbia Limited Liability Company". Incfile.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ For example, HMRC in the United Kingdom, see HMRC Tax Manuals, DT19853A
^ "Who Can Own an LLC". The-llc-company.com. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ "Maintaining Your Privacy with an Anonymous LLC". Law 4 Small Business. Retrieved 29 August 2016. 
^ "Format ligjore të shoqërive - Acitad". 
^ Ley de Sociedades Comerciales (Spanish) http://www.cnv.gov.ar/LeyesYReg/Leyes/19550.htm
^ [Types of Companies in BiH "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 10 June 2011. Retrieved 2011-05-17. ]
^ "Lei 12.441/11" [Law 12.441/11]. Brazilian Chief of Staff (in Portuguese). July 11, 2011. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ "Veja o valor do salário mínimo em 2015" [Check the value of the minimum wage for 2015]. g1.com.br (in Portuguese). January 1, 2015. Retrieved May 9, 2015. 
^ Commerce Law of Bulgaria, English translation, Chapter 13, Section I, Article 116 Archived 16 June 2010 at the Wayback Machine.
^ Código de Comercio de Colombia, just like S.A..
^ "Screening report : Croatia" (PDF). ec.europa.eu. 18 December 2006. Chapter 6 – Company Law, section IIa. Company law, p.3. 
^ Limited Liability Companies Act 2006 (English translation) http://www.finlex.fi/en/laki/kaannokset/2006/en20060624.pdf
^ Steuerliche Einordnung der nach dem Recht der Bundesstaaten der USA gegründeten Limited Liability Company.
^ a b "Historical Background of the Limited Liability Company". Llc-reporter.com. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ Σκουζός, Ιάσων. "Procedure for the incorporation of a Greek Limited Liability Company (E.P.E.) - Iason Skouzos & Partners - Law Firm". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Company type and name | English. Investhk.gov.hk (2012-07-27). Retrieved on 2013-07-19.
^ "Hungary KFT". Zenron Consulting. Retrieved 29 October 2014. 
^ "Company Conversion into LLP In India - Legalraasta". 15 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "La S.p.A. si costituisce con capitale minimo di 50.000 € - FISCOeTASSE.com". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ "http://www.irfanlaw.com/blog/company-annual-statutory-return-filing-karachi-pakistan/". Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "http://www.sunarp.gob.pe/Aten24h/pdf/Anexo02.pdf" (PDF). Archived from the original (PDF) on 5 March 2016. Retrieved 31 May 2016.  External link in |title= (help)
^ "LEGE nr.31 din 16 noiembrie 1990 privind societăţile comerciale". Cdep.ro. 2003-08-22. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "Limited Liability Company: Encyclopedia of Russian Law". Russianlawonline.com. 14 January 2009. Archived from the original on 5 March 2012. Retrieved 5 May 2012. 
^ ITG. "Llojet e bizneseve - ITG". 
^ Zákon č. 513/1991 Zb. – Obchodný zákonník (in Slovak)
^ "Guide to doing business in Slovakia" (PDF). Ružička Csekes; CMS. January 2013. Retrieved 9 April 2014. 
^ Swedish Companies Registration Office about Aktiebolag "Archived copy". Archived from the original on 18 August 2010. Retrieved 2010-08-21. 
^ "Publika aktiebolag - Bolagsverket". Bolagsverket.se. Archived from the original on 15 February 2012. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ official German text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/d/sr/220/index3.html, official French text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/f/rs/220/index3.html, official Italian text: http://www.admin.ch/ch/i/rs/220/index3.html
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 772ss
^ a b Unofficial translation of term pursuant to: Swiss Code of Obligations, Volume II, Company Law, Articles 552 – 964, English Translation of the Official Text, Swiss-American Chamber of Commerce, Zurich 1992
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 722 paragraph 1
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 802
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 811
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 808 paragraph 4
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 790
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, articles 620ss
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 716a
^ Swiss Code of Obligations, article 622 paragraph 1
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "LLC formation Ukraine". 
^ Thor, Anatoliy. "Dividend payment in Ukraine". 
^ "legal forms of business". 
^ trinitygroup.eu
^ "Limited Liability Company (LLC)". Irs.gov. 2011-06-21. Retrieved 2012-01-04. 
^ "State of Wyoming Legislature". Retrieved 31 May 2016. 
^ Keatinge et al.,"The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Business Lawyer 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992) (citing Act of 4 March 1977, ch. 155, 1977 Wyo.Sess.Laws 512).
^ Priv. Ltr. Rul. 81-06-082, 1980 WL 137231 (18 Nov. 1980)
^ Prop. Treas. Reg. § 301.7701-2, 45 Fed. Reg. 75,709 (1980)
^ Fla.Stat.Ann. §§ 608.401–471
^ Keatinge et al., "The Limited Liability Company: A Study of the Emerging Entity," 47 Bus. Law. 375, 383-384 (Feb. 1992)
^ Rev.Rul. 88-76, 1988-2 C.B. 360.
^ Larry E. Ribstein, A Critique of the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, 25 Stetson Law Review 312, 322 (1995).
^ Limited Liability Company (Revised). Uniform Law Commission.








v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 309848916
LCCN: no2014092724
GND: 7593437-1
NDL: 01016930










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Limited_liability_company&oldid=790622416"					
Categories: Corporate taxation in the United StatesLegal entitiesTypes of business entityHidden categories: CS1 Portuguese-language sources (pt)Webarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: external linksArticles lacking in-text citations from May 2009All articles lacking in-text citationsUse dmy dates from May 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from January 2015Articles with unsourced statements from December 2013Articles to be merged from December 2014All articles to be mergedArticles containing Albanian-language textArticles with unsourced statements from November 2009Articles with unsourced statements from May 2009Articles with unsourced statements from August 2014Articles containing Spanish-language textWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Bân-lâm-gúDeutschFrançaisՀայերենहिन्दीИронಕನ್ನಡქართულიLatviešuLietuviųBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語PolskiSlovenčinaСрпски / srpskiSvenskaதமிழ்ТоҷикӣTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 14 July 2017, at 23:52.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Industry Statistics, Trends and Analysis from First Research, a D&B Company 












(866) 788-9389
Toll Free International: (800) 486-8666
 
Home
|
Cart
|
About Us
|
Contact Us
|
Site Map
 
Subscriber Login










Industry Profiles



State & Province Profiles



Subscriptions









 Industries


 State/Province






Keyword
NAIC
SIC





Browse Complete Industry List
Browse List of States and Provinces










First Research Industry Profiles
Discover unique opportunities hidden in more than 1000 industry segments! First Research is the leading provider of market analysis tools that help sales and marketing teams perform faster and smarter, open doors and close more deals. See how First Research services can be tailored to your needs:
Subscriptions
A La Carte Reports


The complete suite of First Research tools provides:

Unlimited access to downloadable market analysis
Complete integration into your sales workflow
Risk reduction and powerful relationship management
Trend prediction using at-a-glance financial ratios

Learn More




Individual intelligence reports are perfect for deep, detailed research on a specific business topic:

Specific profiles of industries, US states, and Canadian provinces
Highlights risks, opportunities, call preparation questions, and more
Available for immediate download
Subscription not included with purchase

Learn More









Copyright 2017, Hoover's, Inc., All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy. 
   

Home
|
Cart
|
About Us
|
Contact Us
|
Site Map














First Quality




First Quality Enterprises, Inc.
Home.Careers.Investors.Contact Us.Site Map.

First Quality HomeCommitmentCompaniesPeopleProductsKnowledge
Quality. First.Please download the latest version of Adobe Flash Player to view this content.








First Quality is a recognized leader in Long Term Care, Assisted Living and Acute Care markets with innovative, high quality Incontinence Products & Disposable Washcloths. more
Marketing First Quality's Adult Incontinence Products, Disposable Washcloths, Infant Care, Feminine Hygiene & Paper Products to distributors and retailers throughout North America. more
First Quality offers a comprehensive product line of incontinence products providing choices and value for those dealing with incontinence at home.more
First Quality Nonwovens, Inc. (FQN) provides the market with high quality spunmelt nonwovens. more


In the News

Nutek Disposables, Inc. Issues Correction Regarding Fake Recall News 
First Quality To Expand Manufacturing Capacity For Its Ultra-Premium Towel And Tissue Products As Part Of Long-Term Growth Plan
VA Celebrates New Strategic Partnerships on Veterans Day
First Quality's Dri-Fit Innovates Within Feminine And Adult Care Products
First Quality donates $250,000 to Anderson University
First Quality donates $250,000 to the Lock Haven University Foundation
First Quality donates $100,000 to the One SC Fund
First Quality Completes Acquisition of Fempro I Inc. Business



First Quality Companies

First Quality International
First Quality Retail Services
First Quality Consumer Products
First Quality Baby Products
First Quality Hygienic
First Quality Nonwovens (Wuxi)
First Quality Products
First Quality Tissue
First Quality Water & Beverage
Nutek Disposables
First Quality Enterprises
First Quality Nonwovens
First Quality Packaging Solutions
First Quality Print and Packaging
Fempro Consumer Products ULCFirst Quality BrandsFirst Quality ProductsPlease download the latest version of Adobe Flash Player to view this content.
CommitmentCompaniesPeopleProductsKnowledgeNews & EventsCopyright © 2011 First Quality Enterprises, Inc.Contact UsLegalSite Map









Product Home Page



















Rules Management
		

Account Manager

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Alternate Letters

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Fraud Score Entrance Criteria

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Change In Terms Manager

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Debit Auth Plus

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


DisclosureDesign ManagerSM

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Dynamic Fees

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


DefenseEdge®

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Entity Management

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Penalty Fee Manager

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Pricing

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Proprietary

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Provisioning

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Rewards Applications

Rewards Parameters

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Offline Rewards

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle


Dynamic Rewards 

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle



Risk

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle








Issuer Applications
				

DataChoice® Hyperion 1.1 
DataChoice® Hyperion 1.2
DataChoice® Workspace Advanced
Statement Reprints
First Data WebTrack®
FirstSwitch
Fraud Management
Issuer Marketing Products

Enhanced Decision Management System

B-Cycle
C-Cycle
E-Cycle
N-Cycle
Z-Cycle



Acquirer Applications
				
Client.eMerchantViewSM
eMerchantView®






Shared Applications
				
Web3270AccessSM

ROWnetSM (v. 4.5)










 


